District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.35

Applicant’s choice.

If the applicant agrees to construct or rehabilitate affordable housing pursuant to § 1-306.33(1), the applicant may satisfy this agreement in any manner chosen by the applicant, including but not limited to a joint venture, partnership, contract, or arrangement with another party to develop the required housing.

History

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1498